apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="হ/াঁট__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটো</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটোনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটিস</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটিসনে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেন</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেননা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেন</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেননা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটব</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবিনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেন</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেননা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেনা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেন</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটবেননা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটা</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটতে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটার</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটেছিল</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটেনি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটেছিলাম</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটিনি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটেছিলে</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটনি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটেছিলি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটিসনি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েঁটেছিলেন</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াঁটেননি</l>
          <r>াঁট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    <e lm="হাঁট"><i>হ</i><par n="হ/াঁট__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="সাঁট"><i>স</i><par n="হ/াঁট__vblex"/></e>
